Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 2

Rights-of-Way

65-21-201. Rights-of-way authorized.

Any person or corporation organized for the purpose of transmitting intelligence by magnetic telegraph or telephone, or other system of transmitting intelligence the equivalent thereof, which may be invented or discovered, may construct, operate, and maintain such telegraph, telephone, or other lines necessary for the speedy transmission of intelligence, along and over the public highways and streets of cities and towns, or across and under the waters, and over any lands or public works belonging to this state, and on and over the lands of private individuals, and upon, along, and parallel to any of the railroads, and on and over the bridges, trestles, or structures of such railroads.

Acts 1885, ch. 66, § 1; Shan., § 1830; mod. Code 1932, § 3094; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2105.

Cross-References. Obstruction of public ways, § 65-21-202.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Telecommunications, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Property Law — Buhl v. US Sprint Communications Co.: Ascertaining the Rights of Fee Owners On Whose Land A Railroad Easement Exists, 22 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 843 (1992).

Attorney General Opinions. A telecommunications provider that has been granted a certificate of public convenience and necessity by the Tennessee Regulatory Authority to provide competing access services and transport telecommunications services in Tennessee is entitled to exercise right-of-way and eminent domain powers under Tennessee law. OAG 15-16, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 15 (3/3/2015).

65-21-202. Obstruction of public ways prohibited.

The ordinary use of such public highways, streets, works, railroads, bridges, trestles, or structures shall not be thereby obstructed, nor the navigation of such waters impeded, and just damages shall be paid to the owners of such lands, railroads, and turnpikes, by reason of the occupation of the lands, railroads, and turnpikes by the telegraph or telephone corporations.

Acts 1885, ch. 66, § 1; Shan., § 1831; Code 1932, § 3095; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2106.

Cross-References. Construction of lines, liability for damages, § 65-21-205.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Telecommunications, § 3.

65-21-203. No exclusive rights permitted.

No telegraph or telephone corporation has the power to contract with the owners of lands or the rights in lands, or with any other person or corporation, for the right to erect, operate, or maintain telegraph, telephone, or other lines or works for the speedy transmission of intelligence, over the lands, privileges, rights, or easements of such owner or other person or corporation, to the exclusion of other persons or corporations authorized to erect and operate lines and works for the speedy transmission of intelligence.

Acts 1885, ch. 66, § 4; Shan., § 1834; Code 1932, § 3098; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2107.

Cross-References. Use of poles of other companies, § 65-21-105.

Collateral References.

Right of telephone company not having an exclusive franchise to protection in its use of streets against or damages for, interference with its operations, property or plant, by competitor. 119 A.L.R. 445.

65-21-204. Condemnation.

In the event such telegraph or telephone companies should fail, upon application to such individuals, railroads, companies, to secure such right-of-way, by consent, contract, or agreement, then such telegraph or telephone corporations shall have the right to proceed to procure the condemnation of such property, lands, rights, privileges, and easements, in the manner prescribed by law for taking private property for works of internal improvement.

Acts 1885, ch. 66, § 2; Shan., § 1832; Code 1932, § 3096; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2108.

Cross-References. Eminent domain, title 29, ch. 16.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, § 17; 23 Tenn. Juris., Telecommunications, § 3.

Attorney General Opinions. A telecommunications provider that has been granted a certificate of public convenience and necessity by the Tennessee Regulatory Authority to provide competing access services and transport telecommunications services in Tennessee is entitled to exercise right-of-way and eminent domain powers under Tennessee law. OAG 15-16, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 15 (3/3/2015).

65-21-205. Construction of lines — Liability for damages.

When any such telegraph or telephone company shall desire to construct lines on or along the lands of individuals, or on the right-of-way and structures of any railroad, the telegraph or telephone company may, by its agents, have the right peacefully to enter upon such lands, structures, or right-of-way, and survey, locate, and lay out its lines thereon, being liable, however, for any damage that may result by reason of such act.

Acts 1885, ch. 66, § 3; Shan., § 1833; mod. Code 1932, § 3097; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2109.

Cross-References. Sales of property to telephone cooperatives exempt from sales tax, § 67-6-325.